Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB582.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.14-020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(2) "Commission" means the GRANT Commission established in KRS 154.14-080;
(3) "County population ranking" means the score of each county determined by the
cabinet under KRS 154.14-050(7);
(4) "Eligible grant recipient" means a grant applicant, including a subapplicant or
subrecipient of a federal grant through an agency or department of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, that is:
(a) A county or city governing body, including any nonprofit corporation
created by a governmental agency under KRS 58.180; or
(b) A nonprofit corporation organized under KRS Chapters 14A and 273 and
that qualifies[or nonprofit charitable organization organized] under 26 U.S.C.
sec. 501(c)(3) and is engaged in public benefit improvements;
(5) "Eligible project" means a project that:
(a) Benefits the public or substantially benefits the public and satisfies the
evaluation criteria in KRS 154.14-050 and that is initiated on:
1. Publicly owned property;
2. Property to be acquired, which comes with either a:
a. Legally binding letter of intent or option for the sale to an eligible
grant recipient; or
b. Legally binding sale agreement for the sale to an eligible grant
recipient; or
3. Private property on which a project is located that is in the public
interest and for a public purpose and that benefits an eligible
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
community; and
(b) Requires local matching funds based on the county population ranking as
provided in KRS 154.14-050;
(6) "Eligible use" means the authorized purpose for which an awarded grant may be
used depending on the source of funds from the Commonwealth;
(7) "Interagency Working Group" means the Interagency Working Group on Coal and
Power Plant Communities and Economic Revitalization established by Presidential
Executive Order 14008, issued on January 27, 2021;
(8) "Population density":
(a) Means the number of persons per square mile of a county;
(b) Is calculated by dividing the total county population by the square miles in the
county;
(c) Is determined by using the population estimate from the most recent available
five (5) year American Community Survey as published by the United States
Census Bureau; and
(d) Is used to rank each county in descending order, with the county having the
largest population density receiving a rank of one (1) and the county with the
smallest population density receiving a rank of one hundred twenty (120);
(9) "Regional project" means an eligible project that is proposed by eligible grant
recipients residing or having a primary business address in different counties in this
Commonwealth who submit a single grant application; and
(10) "Ten (10) year percentage change in population":
(a) Means the percentage change in population within a county;
(b) Is determined by comparing the population estimate from the most recent
available five (5) year American Community Survey as published by the
United States Census Bureau to the same survey ten (10) years prior to the
most recent available survey; and
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
(c) Is used to rank each county in descending order, with the county having the
largest positive percentage change in population receiving a rank of one (1)
and the county with the largest negative percentage change receiving a rank of
one hundred twenty (120).
Section 2. KRS 154.14-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024
is hereby established under the cabinet, subject to the approval of the commission
established in KRS 154.14-080. The cabinet's administration of the program
includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Creating and making available a standardized grant application and a regional
grant application for the obligation of state funds under this subchapter to
apply for matching federal funds;
(b) Developing a standardized scoring system pursuant to this section and KRS
154.14-050;
(c) Reviewing and processing the applications submitted by the proposed eligible
grant recipients to the cabinet;
(d) Verifying and determining whether a match applicant is an eligible grant
recipient that is seeking a federal grant for an eligible project or has received
a notice of an award of a federal grant for an eligible project within the two
(2) year period preceding the submission of the match application;
(e) Evaluating the project proposed by the match application in accordance with
the evaluation criteria set forth in this section and KRS 154.14-050.
(f) Scoring each match application pursuant to the scoring system described in
KRS 154.14-050;
(g) Ranking each match application:
1. To prioritize the greatest return on investment and relative positive
impact of the eligible project; and
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
2. Based on the project evaluation and the project score described in this
section and KRS 154.14-050.
(h) Compiling a list of proposed match applicants whose eligible project
demonstrates a high level of investment potential if a match is provided, as
revealed by the evaluation, scoring, and ranking process described in this
section and KRS 154.14-050;
(i) Providing detailed feedback to the match applicants after the project
evaluation and project score are completed and the match application is
approved or denied by the cabinet, unless otherwise prohibited by federal or
state law;
(j) Obligating matching funds to selected eligible grant recipients;
(k) Compiling the monthly report to be submitted under KRS 154.14-070; and
(l) Compiling the annual report to be submitted under KRS 154.14-070.
(2) The cabinet shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements of application
for match funds awarded from the Government Resources Accelerating Needed
Transformation Program of 2024 fund. Eligible grant recipients shall be allowed to
apply for match funds for a period of two (2) years after receiving notice of an
award of a federal grant for an eligible project. The cabinet may establish
procedures and standards for the review and approval of obligation of match funds
through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A. By December 1, 2024, the cabinet shall submit recommended
legislative changes to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to and for
consideration by the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
and the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue or the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(3) The secretary of the cabinet shall have the authority to hire staff, contract for
services, expend funds, and operate the normal business activities of the
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024.
Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45A, the cabinet may contract with a third party for
implementation and administration of the program.
(4) The Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024
as provided in this subchapter shall sunset on December 31, 2026, unless authorized
by the General Assembly to continue its work for a specified period of time.
Notwithstanding the termination of the program under this subsection, the
cabinet shall administer any grants awarded prior to the sunset date until all
awarded funds have been fully disbursed to the eligible grant recipients.
(5) The Kentucky Council of Area Development Districts and local area development
districts shall assist eligible grant recipients in identifying available federal grant
opportunities and preparing federal grant applications and Government Resources
Accelerating Needed Transformation Program of 2024 applications. Nothing in this
subsection shall prevent any public agency or nonprofit entity from assisting
eligible grant recipients in identifying available federal grant opportunities and
preparing federal grant applications and Government Resources Accelerating
Needed Transformation Program of 2024 applications.
(6) Upon request of the local area development districts, a local public institution in the
postsecondary education system as defined in KRS 164.001 shall assist the eligible
grant recipients in their area by including but not limited to:
(a) Identifying opportunities for federal grants;
(b) Rendering supplemental support for federal grant applications on behalf of the
communities including but not limited to providing data and analysis for the
federal grant application; or
(c) Acting as the contact person for the local public institution to the Kentucky
Council of Area Development Districts and to the area development district in
which the local public institution is located and updating the contact person
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
information.
Section 3. KRS 154.14-060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the Government Resources Accelerating Needed Transformation Program
of 2024 fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations,
gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered and maintained by the cabinet.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for awarding:
(a) Matching funds to applicants of the Government Resources Accelerating
Needed Transformation Program of 2024 upon notification of award of the
federal grant requiring matching funds. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the
amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for match awards to nonprofit
corporations as specified in subsection (4)(b) of Section 1 of this Act[for
nonprofit charitable organizations organized under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3)];
and
(b) Matching funds to applicants of the Government Resources Accelerating
Needed Transformation Program of 2024 upon notification of award of the
federal grant requiring matching funds. Up to eighty percent (80%) of the
amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for match awards to county or
city governing bodies or nonprofit corporations created by governmental
agencies as specified in subsection (4)(a) of Section 1 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the account not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
(6) Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in
this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1439
for any other purposes.
(7) Any match funds awarded under subsection (3) of this section shall be canceled
upon denial of the federal award.
(8) On or after June 30, 2024, any unencumbered moneys in the fund established in
KRS 147A.158 shall be transferred to the Government Resources Accelerating
Needed Transformation Program of 2024 fund administered by the Cabinet for
Economic Development created in this section.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed